New Mexico, session 2026, HB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS-- DEMOGRAPHIC DATA COLLECTION--PARENTAL EDUCATIONAL ATTAINMENT.-- A. The institutions of higher education enumerated in Article 12, Section 11 of the constitution of New Mexico shall collect voluntarily provided demographic data that pertains to the educational attainment of a prospective student's parent, legal guardian or fictive kin on the institution's application or registration forms. The data collected shall be reported to the higher education department separately and with other demographic data collected by the institution. The department shall publish a report of the data provided in this subsection separately and in combination with other demographic data collected by the institutions. B. The data collected pursuant to Subsection A of this section may be aggregated at the state, county, municipality, census tract or zip code level so as to prevent identifying individuals and statistical unreliability. The data may be used by the institutions or department to: (1) facilitate demographic comparisons or identify demographic disparities; (2) improve the quality of academics and educational services; (3) conduct approved academic research; (4) provide information and reports required for federal and private grants; and (5) guide academic and other institutional policies and funding decisions. - 2 -